Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2129
Provisional certification as master social worker; qualifications; application; expiration.

(1) A person who needs to obtain the required three thousand hours of supervised experience in social work as specified in section 38-2128 to qualify for certification as a master social worker shall obtain a provisional certification as a master social worker. To qualify for a provisional certification as a master social worker, such person shall:

(a) Have a doctorate or master's degree in social work from an approved educational program; and

(b) Apply prior to earning the three thousand hours of supervised experience.

(2) A provisional master social worker certification shall expire upon receipt of certification as a master social worker or five years after the date of issuance, whichever comes first.

(3) A person who holds a provisional certification as a master social worker shall inform all clients that he or she holds a provisional certification and is practicing social work under supervision and shall identify the supervisor. Failure to make such disclosure is a ground for discipline as set forth in section 38-2139.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 82;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 74;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,319.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 746.